Utah statutes.
78B-5-611.   Proof of wills.
A last will and testament, except a nuncupative will, is invalid, unless it is
in writing and executed in accordance with Title 75, Chapter 2, Part 5, Wills.
When a will is to be shown, the instrument itself shall be produced, or
secondary evidence of its contents given.
